Vermont statutes. Title 3 Executive
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 101.
Commission; office.

The Secretary of State shall be commissioned by the Governor and shall keep an office open for the transaction of business.

§ 102.
Seal.

The Secretary shall have a seal of office, with the same device as the State Seal, and around the Seal the words: SECRETARY OF STATE.
VERMONT.
Full faith and credit shall be given to certified copies and attestations under his or her Seal.

§ 102a.
Facsimile signature of Secretary of State.

A facsimile of the signature of the Secretary of State imprinted by or at his or her direction upon any certification issued under Title 11 or 11A, upon any attestation required of the Secretary by law or upon any certification of official documents or records of which the Secretary is custodian shall have the same validity as the Secretary of State’s written signature.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. Feb. 16, 1994.

§ 103.
Documents required to be filed.

All deeds, contracts of sale, leases, and other documents or copies of same conveying land or an interest therein to the State, except for transportation rights-of-way, leases, and conveyances, shall be filed in the Office of the Secretary of State.

All deeds, contracts of sale, leases, and other documents conveying land or an interest in land from the State as grantor, except for transportation rights-of-way, leases, and conveyances, shall be made out in duplicate by the authorized agent of the State. The original shall be delivered to the grantee and the duplicate copy, so marked, shall be filed in the Office of the Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall also record the State Treasurer’s bonds and other documents required to be recorded in the Secretary of State’s office and give copies of the same upon tender of the Secretary of State’s legal fees.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 31.

§ 104.
Preparation and publication of acts and resolutions.

After an act or resolution has been passed by both Houses of the General Assembly, signed by the presiding officers of both Houses and by the Governor, it shall be delivered to the custody of the Secretary of State.
The Secretary shall cause the act or resolution to be reproduced in form suitable to be submitted to the printer designated in

29 V.S.A. § 1115

. Before submission to the printer, the Secretary shall correct obvious typographical errors and assign a public law number to each act or resolution.
The Secretary shall cause a suitable index and reference tables to be prepared.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 90

, § 2.

§ 105.
Repealed.
1967, No. 257 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Feb. 21, 1968.

§ 106.
Acts and resolutions of the General Assembly.

After the original acts and resolutions of the General Assembly are delivered to the Secretary pursuant to section 104 of this title, the Secretary shall cause a copy of the acts and resolutions to be prepared and printed and the original acts and resolutions to be preserved as State archival records pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 117

.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 90

, § 3; amended

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(c)(2), eff. May 6, 1996;

2009, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 6, 2010;

2021, No. 53

, § 1.

§ 107.
Legislative clerk.

The Secretary of State shall designate members of his or her staff as legislative clerks. The duties of legislative clerks shall be:

to prepare a copy of the acts and resolutions for printing;

to keep a register of lobbyists;

to prepare and distribute certified copies of resolutions as directed by the General Assembly;

to prepare index and tables of laws for the acts and resolves;

to prepare a legislative directory containing appropriate matter by December 1 of each odd numbered year; and

such other legislative duties as the Secretary shall assign.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 90

, § 4; amended

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(c)(2), eff. May 6, 1996;

2021, No. 53

, § 2.

§ 108.
Compilations, indices, bulletins, and circulars.

The Secretary shall cause to be prepared and printed such compilations of the different chapters of the Vermont Statutes Annotated, and amendments thereto or laws affecting the subject matter thereof, as may be necessary for the purpose of distribution, exchange, or for the use of the respective State officers, commissioners, departments, and citizens of the State.
The Secretary may cause such compilations to be provided with the proper indices.
He or she shall also cause bulletins or circulars to be prepared and printed relating to statistical and other matters of public nature on file or recorded in his or her office, and may employ necessary assistance for the preparation of such compilations, indices, bulletins, and circulars.
The expense of such preparation and publication of such compilations, indices, bulletins, and circulars shall be paid by the State, and the Commissioner of Finance and Management shall issue his or her warrants for such expenses when the accounts therefor have been duly approved by the Secretary.
All accounts for printing shall also be approved by the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services before the Commissioner of Finance and Management issues such warrants.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 30

, eff. March 17, 1961;

1983, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5(b);

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(c)(2), eff. May 6, 1996.

§ 109.
Laws and journals.

The Secretary shall procure one copy of the printed journal of each House of the General Assembly at each session thereof, one copy of the laws passed at such session, one copy of this and all subsequent revisions of the laws, immediately after the same are printed and published, and deposit the same in his or her office, which, with such laws and journals and revisions of the laws as are now in his or her office, shall be kept therein and shall not be taken therefrom unless by authority of law.

§ 110.
Surveyor General’s papers.

All books, papers and records of the Surveyor General which are in the possession of the State or may come into its possession shall be in the custody of the Secretary of State, and copies thereof duly certified by such officer shall be evidence in court and have the same force as the original.

§ 111.
Township charters.

The Secretary shall procure from the proper sources authenticated copies of such original charters of townships in this State as were not granted by the General Assembly.

Copies of original charters of townships deposited in the Secretary of State’s office shall be valid records of such charters, and such record or copies thereof duly certified by the Secretary of State shall be competent evidence of such original charters in Court.

§ 112.
Statements and communications to General Assembly.

The Secretary shall make such statements and communications to the General Assembly as may be required by it.

§ 113.
Record by photostatic or photographic method.

The Secretary of State may record by photostatic or photographic method any instrument, paper, or document required by law to be recorded by him or her, and he or she may give photostatic or photographic copies of the same, required by law to be filed or recorded with him or her, upon tender of his or her legal fees. Such copies, duly certified by him or her, shall be competent evidence in court and have the same force as the originals thereof would have had, if produced in court.

HISTORY:

Amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§§ 114-114a.
Repealed. 1989, No. 250 (Adj. Sess.), § 92.

§ 115.
Repealed.
1975, No. 118, § 101.

§ 116.
Repealed.
1981, No. 217 (Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 116a. Section 116a effective January 1, 2023. State boards and commissions registry.

The Vermont State Archives and Records Administration shall maintain and make available on its website a registry of State boards and commissions and shall update that registry when changes are made that affect the information provided in the registry.
(a) (1) The Vermont State Archives and Records Administration shall maintain and make available on its website a registry of State boards and commissions and shall update that registry when changes are made that affect the information provided in the registry.

The registry shall include the names of the members of each State board and commission, their term length and expiration, and their appointing authority.
(2) (A) The registry shall include the names of the members of each State board and commission, their term length and expiration, and their appointing authority.

Each State board and commission shall be responsible for providing to the Vermont State Archives and Records Administration this registry information and any updates to it in a manner prescribed by the State Archivist.

The registry shall track the dates of the initial creation of State boards and commissions created by State law and of any amendments to those laws for the purpose of the intended five-year expiration of those State boards and commissions described in subsection (b) of this section.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that, except for State boards and commissions required by interstate compact and except as otherwise provided by law, a State board or commission created by State law shall cease to exist after five years from the date of its initial creation, five years from the last date that the statutory or session law containing the State board or commission was amended, or on January 1, 2025, whichever date is latest.
(b) (1) It is the intent of the General Assembly that, except for State boards and commissions required by interstate compact and except as otherwise provided by law, a State board or commission created by State law shall cease to exist after five years from the date of its initial creation, five years from the last date that the statutory or session law containing the State board or commission was amended, or on January 1, 2025, whichever date is latest.

In each biennial session beginning in the year 2025, the Office of Legislative Counsel, in consultation with the Vermont State Archives and Records Administration and based on the registry’s date tracking described in subdivision (a)(3) of this section, shall prepare for the General Assembly’s review a list of the State boards and commissions subject to expiration under this subsection.
(2) (A) In each biennial session beginning in the year 2025, the Office of Legislative Counsel, in consultation with the Vermont State Archives and Records Administration and based on the registry’s date tracking described in subdivision (a)(3) of this section, shall prepare for the General Assembly’s review a list of the State boards and commissions subject to expiration under this subsection.

A State board or commission shall only expire pursuant to legislative enactment.

As used in this section, “State board or commission” means a professional or occupational licensing board or commission, advisory board or commission, appeals board, promotional board, interstate board, supervisory board or council, or any other similar entity that:

is created by State law, by federal law and contains State appointees, or by executive order;

is established as or is attached to an Executive Branch entity;

has statewide jurisdiction or carries out a State function; and

is not composed of members appointed exclusively by regional, county, or municipal entities.

HISTORY:

Added

2018, No. 2

(Sp. Sess.), § 12, eff. Jan. 1, 2019; amended

2019, No. 61

, § 1.

§ 117.
Vermont State Archives and Records Administration.

As used in this chapter:

“Records and information management” means the efficient and systematic control of the creation, receipt, maintenance, use, and disposition of public records, including the processes for capturing and maintaining evidence of, and information about, public agency business activities and transactions in the form of public records.

“Archives” or “archival records” means public records that have continuing legal, administrative, or informational value.

“Appraisal” means the identification, classification, and analysis of all public records, regardless of physical form or characteristics, to determine their value and ultimate disposition, based upon their legal, administrative, or informational value.

“Public record” or “public document” has the same meaning as set forth in

1 V.S.A. § 317

.

“Public agency” has the same meaning as set forth in

1 V.S.A. § 317

.

“Record schedule” means a policy issued by the Vermont State Archives and Records Administration and approved by the State Archivist governing the life cycle management, retention, and disposition of public records.

There is created within the Office of the Secretary of State the Vermont State Archives and Records Administration, which is charged with administering a Statewide Records and Information Management Program for all public agencies in accordance with generally accepted record-keeping principles and industry standards and best practices.

Services of the Statewide Records and Information Management Program shall include:

providing assistance to public agencies in establishing, maintaining, and implementing active and continuing internal records and information management programs for the effective management of records produced or acquired in the course of public agency business;

ensuring that low-cost, secure repositories and systems for public records, regardless of format, are available at an enterprise or statewide level and managed and operated in a manner that supports compliance with generally accepted record-keeping principles, industry standards, best practices, the Public Records Act, this section, and, where applicable, section 218 of this title;

developing, issuing, and maintaining statewide records and information management standards and information governance frameworks;

performing formal appraisals of public records and issuing record schedules accordingly;

operating a Records Center to hold inactive analog State public records in accordance with record schedules;

accepting land records submitted on microfilm by municipal and county clerks for storage in the Records Center;

taking legal custody of State archival records, regardless of format, in accordance with record schedules; and

arranging, describing, and preserving archival records in accordance with archival principles and best practices, and promoting their use by government officials and the public.

The State Archivist may appoint an advisory committee to provide assistance and support for the State Archives and Records Administration.

The Secretary may adopt rules consistent with this section.

There shall be the Director of the Vermont State Archives and Records Administration who shall have the title of “State Archivist,” who shall be qualified by education and professional experience to perform the duties of the position, and who shall simultaneously serve as Chief Records Officer. The State Archivist shall be a classified position within the Office of the Secretary of State.

In fulfilling the duties as Director of the Vermont State Archives and Records Administration, the State Archivist shall:

issue policies, standards, guidelines, and procedures necessary to carry out the provisions of this section;

administer and maintain the Statewide Records and Information Management Program for the efficient and systematic control of public records;

approve record schedules governing the life cycle management, retention, and disposition of public records;

receive grants, gifts, aid, or assistance, of any kind, from any source, public or private, for the purpose of managing, preserving, or promoting public records; and

serve as chair of the Vermont Historical Records Advisory Board pursuant to 36 C.F.R. part 1206 for the purposes of improving public access to, and engagement with, Vermont historical records and encouraging and facilitating collaborative efforts among Vermont historical records repositories.

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

There is hereby created the Public Records Special Fund. The Fund shall be administered as a special fund pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5. The purpose of the Fund is to support improved management of public records by State agencies. The Fund shall consist of receipts from other government agencies for the provision of Records and Information Management Program services by the Vermont State Archives and Records Administration in the Office of the Secretary of State. The Fund shall be available to the Office of the Secretary of State and shall be expended for the purposes of activities authorized by subsection 117(c) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 32

, § 1 eff. March 28, 1973; amended

1989, No. 186

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(c)(2), eff. May 6, 1996;

2003, No. 3

, § 1;

2007, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2009, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 6, 2010;

2011, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 14, 2012;

2013, No. 1

, § 77;

2017, No. 74

, § 142;

2017, No. 100

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2019, No. 14

, § 2, eff. April 30, 2019.

§ 118.
Collection and disposition of revenue.

There is hereby created a Secretary of State Services Fund. The Fund shall be used to provide appropriations for the operations of the Office of the Secretary of State, with the exception of those operations provided for in chapter 5, subchapter 3 of this title. The Fund shall be administered as a special fund pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5. At the end of each fiscal year, the unobligated balance in this Fund shall be transferred to the General Fund.

All revenues collected by the Secretary of State shall be deposited into the Secretary of State Services Fund except for the following revenues:

any revenues collected by the Office of Professional Regulation set forth in chapter 5, subchapter 3 of this title; and

any revenues collected pursuant to subsection 117(k) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 1

, § 78.